Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6219.01
Review body, defined.

Review body shall mean the committee, the board, or the director charged with reviewing applications for new credentialing or change in scope of practice.

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 6.